Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.022

Suspended or expelled students—Reengagement plan.

(1) School districts should make efforts to have suspended or expelled students return to an educational setting as soon as possible. School districts must convene a meeting with the student and the student's parents or guardians within twenty days of the student's long-term suspension or expulsion, but no later than five days before the student's enrollment, to discuss a plan to reengage the student in a school program. Families must have access to, provide meaningful input on, and have the opportunity to participate in a culturally sensitive and culturally responsive reengagement plan.

(2) In developing a reengagement plan, school districts should consider shortening the length of time that the student is suspended or expelled, other forms of corrective action, and supportive interventions that aid in the student's academic success and keep the student engaged and on track to graduate. School districts must create a reengagement plan tailored to the student's individual circumstances, including consideration of the incident that led to the student's long-term suspension or expulsion. The plan should aid the student in taking the necessary steps to remedy the situation that led to the student's suspension or expulsion.

(3) Any reengagement meetings conducted by the school district involving the suspended or expelled student and his or her parents or guardians are not intended to replace a petition for readmission.

[ 2016 c 72 s 107; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 308.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: "Nothing in chapter 18, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. prevents a public school district, law enforcement agencies, or law enforcement personnel from enforcing laws protecting health and human safety." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 309.]